Louisiana, session 2026, HB28.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:8.8(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§8.8. Certification appeals; appeals council; membership; duties; reporting;
exceptions
* * *
E.(1) The council shall evaluate the appeals of persons seeking Louisiana
certification, including a review of the documents and transcripts of appellants, and
shall submit a written report of its findings to the board. A decision of the council
shall be a final decision except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2)(a) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education may
override the council's denial of an appellant's appeal if the denial was based on
circumstances beyond the appellant's control as determined by the state board;
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 28 ENROLLED
however, the state board shall not override a denial by the council if it determines
that the certification of the appellant would conflict with state or federal law.
(b) The state board may call a special meeting to consider overriding a denial
of the council. The state board may delegate its authority to override such a denial
to the board president. If an appellant submits a request for the board to override a
denial, either the state board or the board president shall render a decision within
thirty days of receiving the request.
* * *
Section 2. The authority of the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education
to override the Teacher Certification Appeals Council's denial of appeals as provided in R.S.
17:8.8(E) as amended and reenacted by Section 1 of this Act shall have both prospective
application and retroactive application to denials issued by the council between January 1,
2025, and the effective date of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.